Illinois, session 104th, SB3116.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Bees and Apiaries Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2-4, 2a, and 5 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 20/2-4)7    Sec. 2-4. Right of entry. The Department shall have the 8power to inspect or cause to be inspected from time to time any 9bees, colonies, items of bee equipment or apiary. For the 10purpose of inspection, the Director is authorized during 11reasonable business hours to enter into or upon any property 12used for the purpose of beekeeping and, when practicable, 13shall provide notification to the beekeeper or landowner.14(Source: P.A. 88-138.) 15    (510 ILCS 20/2a)  (from Ch. 8, par. 124a)16    Sec. 2a. Transportation Intrastate transportation. 17    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a person may not 18produce, sell, resell, or transport packages, queens, hives, 19nucleus hives, bees, or used bee equipment within Illinois, 20into Illinois, or from Illinois to another state without a 21valid compliance agreement or permit. The permit shall be 22issued by the Department based upon an inspection certificate   SB3116 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18335 BDA 31775 b1from the Department. No person shall transport a colony of 2bees or items of used bee equipment between counties within 3this State without a permit or compliance agreement which 4shall be issued based upon an inspection certificate from the 5Department. 6    (b) The Department may, at its discretion, grant a waiver 7of the permit requirement for the transport of packages, 8queens, hives, nucleus hives, bees, or used bee equipment from 9an Illinois county to a contiguous county in Illinois or a 10neighboring state. An inspection certificate from the 11Department is required regardless of a waiver granted under 12this subsection.13    (c) A person intending to transport packages, queens, 14hives, nucleus hives, bees, or used bee equipment, into 15Illinois from another state must notify the Department at 16least 3 business days prior to entry into the State of 17Illinois. Such person shall be responsible for notifying the 18Department and obtaining an inspection certificate after 19arrival at their Illinois destination, as required by rule.20    (d) Any packages, queens, hives, nucleus hives, bees, or 21used bee equipment (b) A colony of bees or items of used bee 22equipment transported in violation of this Section may be held 23and inspected by the Department, ordered returned to the place 24of origin, or abated.25(Source: P.A. 88-138.)   SB3116 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18335 BDA 31775 b1    (510 ILCS 20/5)  (from Ch. 8, par. 126.1)2    Sec. 5. Rules.3    (a) The Department may Director is authorized to 4promulgate rules and regulations for the enforcement and 5administration of this Act.6    (b) The Department may promulgate any rules necessary to 7implement and administer the changes made to this Act by this 8amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 9(Source: P.A. 82-722.)